Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-17] Acquisition of control of or
merger of a dental insurer. No person may make a tender for or a request
or invitation for tenders of, enter into an agreement to exchange securities
for, or acquire in the open market or otherwise, any voting security of a dental
insurer or enter into any other agreement if, after the consummation thereof,
that person, directly or indirectly, or by conversion or by exercise of any
right to acquire, would be in control of the dental insurer, and no person may
enter into an agreement to merge or consolidate with or otherwise to acquire
control of a dental insurer, unless, at the time any offer, request, or
invitation is made or any agreement is entered into, or prior to the
acquisition of the securities if no offer or agreement is involved, the person
has filed with the commissioner and has sent to the dental insurer information
required by section 431:11-104 and the offer, request, invitation, agreement,
or acquisition has been approved by the commissioner. Approval by the
commissioner shall be governed by section 431:11-104(d); provided that if no
action is taken by the commissioner within thirty days, the offer, request,
invitation, agreement, or acquisition shall be deemed approved. [L 2013, c 191,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next